Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1308
Sections, how construed.

Sections 19-1305 to 19-1308 are supplementary to existing statutes and confer upon and give to cities of the first and second class and villages powers not heretofore granted and sections 19-1305 to 19-1308 shall not be construed as repealing or amending any existing statute.

Laws 1945, c. 38, § 4, p. 194.